Illinois, session 104th, SB3535.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Credit for paid leave.8    (a) The General Assembly finds that: 9        (1) Small businesses are the backbone of Illinois' 10    economy, providing goods, services, and jobs in 11    communities across the State. 12        (2) An overwhelming majority (86%) of Americans have a 13    positive view of small business. 14        (3) Small businesses with less than 50 employees 15    comprise 76% of Illinois businesses and employ 30% of 16    Illinois' workforce. 17        (4) The Paid Leave for All Workers Act shifted the 18    fiscal and economic cost of the State's policy goals onto 19    small, Main Street business, the ones least able to pay 20    for it. 21        (5) Small businesses are struggling due to ever 22    increasing business and operational costs, including those 23    imposed by the Paid Leave for All Workers mandate.   SB3535- 2 -LRB104 16201 HLH 29862 b1    (b) Therefore, for taxable years beginning on or after 2January 1, 2027, each taxpayer that is an eligible small 3employer is entitled to a credit against the taxes imposed by 4subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to 5the amount paid during the taxable year by the eligible small 6employer to its employees as paid leave that is required by the 7Paid Leave for All Workers Act. In no event may the credit 8under this Section exceed more than 40 hours of paid leave for 9each employee of the eligible small employer in any calendar 10year. 11    (c) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce a 12taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 13credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess may 14be carried forward and applied to the tax liability for the 5 15taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax credit 16shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 17liability. If there are credits for more than one year that are 18available to offset liability, the earlier credit shall be 19applied first. 20    (d) For partners and shareholders of Subchapter S 21corporations, the provisions of Section 251 shall apply with 22respect to the credit under this Section. 23    (e) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 24250. 25    (f) As used in this Section: 26    "Eligible small employer" means an employer that employs   SB3535- 3 -LRB104 16201 HLH 29862 b150 or fewer full-time equivalent employees during the taxable 2year and that is subject to the Paid Leave for All Workers Act. 3    "Employer" has the meaning given to that term in the Paid 4Leave for All Workers Act.  5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 61, 2027.